Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.142.010

Bonds, notes, evidences of indebtedness—University of Washington and Washington State University.

The board of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University may issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for any university purpose. The board of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University may obligate all or a component of the fees and revenues of the university for the payment of such bonds, notes, or evidences of indebtedness: PROVIDED, That such fees and revenues are not subject to appropriation by the legislature and do not constitute general state revenues as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. Such bonds, notes, and other indebtedness shall not constitute bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the state or required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from general state revenues. Bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with the procedures in RCW 28B.10.310 and 28B.10.315 or the provisions applicable to either the state or local governments under chapter 39.46 or 39.53 RCW.

[ 2009 c 500 s 4; 2007 c 24 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 500: See note following RCW 39.42.070.